Utah statutes.
41-6a-1503.   Motorcycle or motor-driven cycle -- Attaching to another vehicle prohibited.

A person riding on a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle may not attach himself to any other vehicle on a roadway.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

